Washington statutes.
RCW 6.23.040

Time for redemption from redemptioner—Successive redemptions—Amount to be paid.

(1) If property is redeemed from the purchaser by a redemptioner, as provided in RCW 6.23.020, another redemptioner may, within sixty days after the first redemption, redeem it from the first redemptioner. The property may be again, and as often as a redemptioner is so disposed, redeemed from any previous redemptioner within sixty days after the last redemption, and such sixty-day redemption periods may extend beyond the period prescribed in RCW 6.23.020 for redemption from the purchaser.

(2) The judgment debtor may also redeem from a redemptioner, but in all cases the judgment debtor shall have the entire redemption period prescribed by RCW 6.23.020, but no longer unless the time is extended under RCW 6.23.030 or 6.23.090. If the judgment debtor redeems, the effect of the sale is terminated and the estate of the debtor is restored.

(3) A redemptioner may redeem under this section by paying the sum paid on the last previous redemption with interest at the rate of eight percent per annum, and the amount of any assessments or taxes which the last previous redemptioner paid on the property after redeeming, with like interest, and the amount of any liens by judgment, decree, deed of trust, or mortgage, other than the judgment under which the property was sold, held by the last redemptioner, prior to his or her own, with interest. A judgment debtor who redeems from a redemptioner under this section must make the same payments as are required to effect a redemption by a redemptioner, including any lien by judgment, decree, deed of trust, or mortgage, other than the judgment under which the property was sold, held by the redemptioner. A redemptioner who pays any taxes or assessments, or has or acquires any such lien as herein mentioned, must file a statement as required under RCW 6.23.050.

[ 2011 c 336 s 145; 1987 c 442 s 704; 1899 c 53 s 9; RRS s 596. Formerly RCW 6.24.150.]